sv: Skjutmålsstil: Kulfång; Klocktavla; Hörntavla; Hängande fickmåltavla; Elektronisk/digital måltavla; Femhålstavla; Skumtavla; Målvaktsduk; Uppblåsbar målvaktstavla; Magnetisk måltavla; Rebounder för puck; Målvaktsduk; Måltavla med nät; Top shelf-måltavla; Universell bungee-måltavla; Övrigt
sl-SI: Stil strelske tarče: Lovilec krogel; Tarča z zvoncem; Kotna tarča; Viseča žepna tarča; Elektronska/digitalna tarča; Tarča s petimi luknjami; Penasta tarča; Vložek za blokiranje gola; Napihljiva tarča (vratar); Magnetna tarča; Tarča za odboj ploščka; Ponjava za trening streljanja; Mrežna tarča za natančnost; Tarča za zgornji kot gola; Univerzalna tarča z elastiko (bungee); Drugo
tr: Atış hedefi stili: Mermi tutucu; Çan hedefi; Köşe hedefi; Sallanan cep hedefi; Elektronik/dijital hedef; Beş delikli hedef; Köpük hedef; Kale engelleyici eklenti; Şişme kaleci hedefi; Manyetik hedef; Pak seken hedef; Atış eğitim brandası/örtüsü; Beceri ağı hedefi; Üst raf hedefi; Evrensel bungee hedefi; Diğer
ko: 사격 표적 방식: 백스톱; 벨 타겟; 코너 타겟; 댕글링 포켓 타겟; 전자식/디지털 타겟; 5홀 타겟; 폼 타겟; 골 블로커 인서트; 공기 주입식 골리 타겟; 자석식 타겟; 퍽 리바운드 타겟; 슈터 튜터 타프/시트; 스킬 네트 타겟; 톱 셸프 타겟; 범용 번지 타겟; 기타
zh-TW: 標靶樣式: 擋彈板; 鈴鐺靶; 角落靶; 懸掛袋靶; 電子/數位靶; 五孔靶; 泡棉靶; 球門擋板靶; 充氣守門員靶; 磁性靶; 冰球反彈靶; 射門練習帆布/布幕; 技巧網靶; 頂角靶; 通用彈力繩靶; 其他
pl: Styl tarczy strzeleckiej: Kulochwyt; Cel z dzwonkiem; Cel narożny; Cel wiszący; Cel elektroniczny/cyfrowy; Cel pięciootworowy; Cel piankowy; Mata treningowa do bramki; Dmuchany bramkarz; Cel magnetyczny; Tarcza odbijająca krążek; Płachta treningowa na bramkę; Siatka celownicza; Cel na górną półkę; Uniwersalny cel na linkach Bungee; Inne
th: สไตล์การยิงเป้า: ฉากรับกระสุน; เป้ารูปกระดิ่ง; เป้าเข้ามุม; เป้าช่องตาข่ายแบบแขวน; เป้าอิเล็กทรอนิกส์/ดิจิทัล; เป้าแบบห้าช่อง; เป้าโฟม; เป้าฝึกยิงหน้าประตู; เป้าผู้รักษาประตูแบบเป่าลม; เป้าแม่เหล็ก; เป้าสะท้อนลูกพัค; ผ้าใบ/แผ่นฝึกยิง; เป้าตาข่ายฝึกทักษะ; เป้ายิงมุมบน; เป้าบันจี้อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
es: Estilo de diana: Parabalas; Blanco con campana; Blanco de esquina; Blanco de bolsillo colgante; Blanco electrónico/digital; Blanco de cinco agujeros; Blanco de espuma; Inserto de bloqueo de portería; Blanco de portero inflable; Blanco magnético; Blanco de rebote de disco; Lona de entrenamiento de tiro; Red de blanco de habilidad; Blanco de escuadra; Blanco elástico universal; Otro
ja: 射撃ターゲットスタイル: バックストップ; ベルターゲット; コーナーターゲット; 吊り下げポケットターゲット; 電子/デジタルターゲット; 5ホールターゲット; フォームターゲット; ゴールブロッカーインサート; 空気注入式ゴーリーターゲット; 磁気ターゲット; パックリバウンドターゲット; シューターチュータータープ/シート; スキルネットターゲット; トップシェルフターゲット; ユニバーサルバンジーターゲット; その他
zh-CN: 射击靶类型: 挡板/挡网; 铃铛靶; 角落靶; 悬挂式口袋靶; 电子/数码靶; 五孔靶; 泡沫靶; 球门封堵器; 充气守门员靶; 磁力靶; 冰球反弹靶; 射击训练篷布/靶布; 技巧网靶; 顶角靶; 通用弹力绳靶; 其他
ru: Стиль стрелковой мишени: Пулеулавливатель; Мишень с колокольчиком; Угловая мишень; Подвесная мишень-карман; Электронная/цифровая мишень; Мишень с пятью отверстиями; Мишень из пеноматериала; Вставка-блокиратор ворот; Надувная мишень-вратарь; Магнитная мишень; Мишень с отскоком шайбы; Мишень-имитатор вратаря (Shooter tutor); Сетчатая мишень для тренировки точности; Мишень для верхних углов; Универсальная мишень на эспандерах; Другая
cs: Styl střelby na terč: Lapač broků/střel; Zvonkový terč; Rohový terč; Závěsný kapsový terč; Elektronický/digitální terč; Pětidírový terč; Pěnový terč; Plachta do branky; Nafukovací brankář; Magnetický terč; Odrazový terč na puky; Střelecká plachta (Shooter Tutor); Tréninková síť (Skill Net); Terč do horního rohu; Univerzální závěsný terč; Jiné
hu: Lőtábla stílusa: Golyófogó; Harangos céltábla; Sarokcél; Függő zsebes cél; Elektronikus/digitális cél; Ötlyukú cél; Habszivacs cél; Kapublokkoló betét; Felfújható kapuscél; Mágneses cél; Visszapattanó cél koronghoz; Lövésgyakorló ponyva; Készségfejlesztő hálós cél; Felső sarok cél; Univerzális gumiköteles cél; Egyéb
el: Στυλ στόχου βολής: Δίχτυ συγκράτησης; Στόχος καμπάνα; Στόχος γωνίας; Κρεμαστός στόχος με τσέπη; Ηλεκτρονικός/ψηφιακός στόχος; Στόχος five-hole; Στόχος από αφρό; Ένθετο μπλοκαρίσματος τέρματος; Φουσκωτός στόχος τερματοφύλακα; Μαγνητικός στόχος; Στόχος επαναφοράς πακ (puck); Μουσαμάς/φύλλο shooter tutor; Στόχος δεξιοτήτων διχτυού; Στόχος top shelf; Στόχος bungee γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
nb: Stil for blinkskyting: Kulefanger; Bjellemål; Hjørnemål; Hengende lommemål; Elektronisk/digitalt mål; Femhullsblink; Skumblink; Målblokkeringsinnsats; Oppblåsbar målvaktblink; Magnetisk blink; Puck-returblink; Skyte-tutor presenning/duk; Ferdighetsnett-blink; Topphylle-blink; Universell strikkblink; Annet
fr: Type de cible de tir: Filet pare-balles; Cible à cloche; Cible de coin; Cible à poche suspendue; Cible électronique/numérique; Cible cinq trous; Cible en mousse; Bloqueur de but; Cible de gardien de but gonflable; Cible magnétique; Cible à rebond pour rondelle; Bâche/toile d’entraînement au tir; Cible à filet d’entraînement; Cible de lucarne; Cible universelle à sandow; Autre
nl: Schietdoel stijl: Kogelvanger; Beldoel; Hoekdoel; Hangend pocketdoel; Elektronisch/digitaal doel; Vijfgatendoel; Schuimdoel; Goal-blocker; Opblaasbaar keeperdoel; Magnetisch doel; Puckrebound-doel; Shooter tutor-zeil/doek; Skillnet-doel; Top shelf-doel; Universeel bungee-doel; Overig
da: Type af skydemål: Bagstopper; Klokkemål; Hjørnemål; Hængende mål med lomme; Elektronisk/digitalt mål; Mål med fem huller; Skummål; Målblokkerindsats; Oppustelig målmandsfigur; Magnetisk mål; Puckrebound-mål; Shooter tutor-presenning/-dug; Skill-netmål; Top shelf-mål; Universelt bungee-mål; Andet
fi: Tarkkuustaulun tyyli: Taustavalli; Kello-maali; Nurkkamaali; Roikkuva pussimaali; Elektroninen/digitaalinen maali; Viisireikäinen maali; Vaahtomuovimaali; Maalinestosuojus; Ilmatäytteinen maalivahtimaali; Magneettimaali; Kiekon palautusmaali; Maalivahtikangas; Tarkkuusverkko; Ylänurkkamaali; Yleinen benjimaali; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de alvo de tiro: Alvo com rede; Alvo com sino; Alvo de canto; Alvo com bolsa suspensa; Alvo eletrónico/digital; Alvo com cinco orifícios; Alvo de espuma; Acessório para bloquear a baliza; Alvo insuflável (guarda-redes); Alvo magnético; Alvo com ressalto para discos; Lona/painel de treino de remate; Alvo de rede de precisão; Alvo para os cantos superiores; Alvo com elásticos universal; Outro
en: Shooting target style: Backstop; Bell target; Corner target; Dangling pocket target; Electronic/digital target; Five-hole target; Foam target; Goal blocker insert; Inflatable goalie target; Magnetic target; Puck rebound target; Shooter tutor tarp/sheet; Skill net target; Top shelf target; Universal bungee target; Other
lt-LT: Šaudymo taikinio stilius: Apsauginė sienelė; Skambantis taikinys; Kampinis taikinys; Kabantis kišeninis taikinys; Elektroninis / skaitmeninis taikinys; Penkių skylių taikinys; Putplasčio taikinys; Vartų blokavimo įdėklas; Pripučiamas vartininko taikinys; Magnetinis taikinys; Ritulių atšokimo taikinys; Treniruočių tentas / uždanga; Įgūdžių tinklo taikinys; Viršutinio kampo taikinys; Universalus taikinys su elastiniu tvirtinimu; Kita
ro-RO: Stil de țintă pentru trageri: Opritor; Țintă cu clopoțel; Țintă de colț; Țintă cu buzunare suspendate; Țintă electronică/digitală; Țintă cu cinci găuri; Țintă din spumă; Insert blocare poartă; Țintă gonflabilă portar; Țintă magnetică; Țintă pentru ricoșeul pucului; Prelată/plasă de antrenament trageri; Țintă plasă pentru abilități; Țintă pentru bara transversală; Țintă universală cu prindere bungee; Altele
hr-HR: Stil gađanja mete: Zaštitna mreža; Meta sa zvonom; Kutna meta; Viseća meta s džepom; Elektronička/digitalna meta; Meta s pet rupa; Pjenasta meta; Umetak za blokiranje gola; Meta na napuhavanje u obliku vratara; Magnetska meta; Odbijajuća meta za pak; Platno za vježbanje preciznosti; Mreža za vježbanje preciznosti; Meta za gornji kut; Univerzalna meta s elastičnim užetom; Drugo
it: Tipo di bersagli da tiro: Paraproiettili; Bersaglio a campana; Bersaglio angolare; Bersaglio a tasca pendente; Bersaglio elettronico/digitale; Bersaglio a cinque fori; Bersaglio in schiuma; Inserto bloccaporte; Bersaglio portiere gonfiabile; Bersaglio magnetico; Bersaglio a rimbalzo per disco; Telo d’allenamento al tiro; Bersaglio a rete di precisione; Bersaglio per angolo superiore; Bersaglio elastico universale; Altro
sk-SK: Štýl streleckého terča: Lapač striel; Zvončekový terč; Rohový terč; Visiaci terč s vreckom; Elektronický/digitálny terč; Terč na päť dier; Penový terč; Vložka do bránky; Nafukovací brankársky terč; Magnetický terč; Odrazová sieť na puky; Tréningová plachta na bránku; Terč so sieťkou; Terč do horného rohu; Univerzálny bungee terč; Iné
vi: Kiểu bắn mục tiêu: Chắn hậu; Mục tiêu chuông; Mục tiêu góc; Mục tiêu túi lủng lẳng; Mục tiêu điện tử/kỹ thuật số; Mục tiêu 5 lỗ; Mục tiêu mút xốp; Mục tiêu che gôn; Mục tiêu thủ môn bơm hơi; Mục tiêu nam châm; Mục tiêu bật đĩa bóng hốc; Bạt che gôn tập bắn; Mục tiêu lưới kỹ năng; Mục tiêu góc trên; Mục tiêu bungee đa năng; Khác
bg-BG: Стил на мишената за стрелба: Преграда; Мишена тип камбана; Ъглова мишена; Висяща джобна мишена; Електронна/дигитална мишена; Мишена с пет дупки; Мишена от пяна; Мрежа за врата; Надуваема вратарска мишена; Магнитна мишена; Мишена за отскачане на шайба; Тренировъчно платно за врата; Тренировъчна мрежа; Мишена за горния ъгъл на вратата; Универсална бънджи мишена; Друго
pt-BR: Alvo de tiro estilo: Aparador de balas; Alvo de sino; Alvo de canto; Alvo de bolso pendente; Alvo eletrônico/digital; Alvo de cinco furos; Alvo de espuma; Painel bloqueador de gol; Alvo de goleiro inflável; Alvo magnético; Alvo de rebote para disco; Lona/painel de treino de arremesso; Alvo de rede de habilidades; Alvo superior (Top shelf); Alvo universal com elástico; Outros
de: Stil der Schießscheibe: Kugelfang; Glockenziel; Eckziel; Hängendes Taschenziel; Elektronisches/Digitales Ziel; Fünfloch-Ziel; Schaumstoffziel; Goal-Blocker-Einsatz; Aufblasbares Torwartziel; Magnetisches Ziel; Puck-Rebound-Ziel; Torwart-Plane (Shooter Tutor); Skill-Netz-Ziel; Top-Shelf-Ziel; Universal-Bungee-Ziel; Sonstige